Massachusetts, session 194th, H2612.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 127 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 17D the following new section:-
Section 17E. For any incarcerated individual covered by a health insurance plan, either
through the individual or the individual’s family, the contracted health insurance carrier shall pay
for all covered medical care under the health insurance plan. If the individual or the individual’s
family cannot afford to pay for co-payments or deductibles under the health insurance plan, then
the health insurance carrier may seek reimbursement from the department of corrections. Health
insurance carriers shall waive any and all additional fees or costs associated with the use of a
non-preferred medical provider for such services while the covered individual is incarcerated
of 1